Utah statutes.
4-22-3.   Commission -- Organization -- Quorum to transact business -- Vacancies -- Ineligibility to serve -- Compensation.

(1)  The members of the commission shall elect a chair, vice chair, and secretary from among their number.

(2)  Attendance of a simple majority of the commission members at a called meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business.

(3)  The commission shall meet:

(a)  at the time and place designated by the chair; and

(b)  no less often than once every three months.

(4)  Vacancies which occur on the commission for any reason shall be filled for the unexpired term of the vacated member by appointment of a majority of the remaining members.

(5)  If a member moves from the district that he represents or ceases to act as a producer during his term of office, he shall resign from the commission within 30 days after moving from the district or ceasing production.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

